Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1182.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the State Board of Vehicle Manufacturers, Dealers and Salespersons; requiring a license to engage in the business as a salesperson, dealer, branch lot, wholesale 1234567891011121314151617181920 vehicle auction, public or retail vehicle auction, manufacturer, factory branch, distributor , OR distributor branch , factory representative or distributor ; regulating the relationship between recreational vehicle dealers, manufacturers and suppliers; and providing penalties.Section 2. The definitions of "branch lot," "buying, selling or exchanging" and "dealer" in section 102 of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another person.* * *"Authorized integrator." A third party that enters into a contract with a dealer to perform a specific function for the dealer and allows the third party to access protected dealer data or to import data into a dealer data system to carry out a specified function.* * *"Branch lot." [An] A dealership with an office and lot maintained in addition to the main office and lot of a licensed vehicle dealer used for the display or sale of vehicles.* * *"Buying, selling or exchanging." Includes listing, offering, auctioning, advertising, representing or soliciting, offering or attempting to solicit or negotiate on behalf of another a sale, purchase or exchange or any similar or related activity[.], 20260SB1182PN1866 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including:(1) Accepting a deposit or receiving a payment for the retail purchase, lease or other use of a vehicle. A related activity does not include facilitating a vehicle dealer's acceptance of a deposit or receipt of a payment from a consumer or receiving payment under a retail installment sale contract OR LEASE . (2) Accepting a reservation from a retail consumer for a specific vehicle identified by a vehicle identification number or other product identifier.(3) Setting the retail price for the purchase, lease or other use of a vehicle. The related activity does not include setting a manufacturer's suggested retail price OR SUGGESTED LEASE PRICE . (4) Offering or negotiating with a retail consumer terms for the purchase, lease or other use of a vehicle.(5) Offering or negotiating with a retail consumer a value for a vehicle being traded in as part of the purchase, lease or other use of a vehicle. A related activity does not include a website or other means of electronic communication that identifies to a consumer a conditional trade-in value and that contains language informing the consumer that the trade-in value is not binding on any vehicle dealer.(6) A transaction where the title of a vehicle is transferred to a retail consumer.(7) A retail lease transaction where a retail consumer leases a vehicle for a period of at least 12 months. A related activity does not include administering lease agreements, taking assignments of leases, performing required actions pursuant to leases or receiving payments under a 20260SB1182PN1866 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lease agreement that was originated by a vehicle dealer.* * *"Consumer data." The term shall mean the same as "nonpublic personal information" as defined under 15 U.S.C. § 6809(4) (relating to definitions) as of January 1, 2024."Controls, is controlled by or is under common control." The possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to participate in, influence or cause the direction of the management and policies whether through ownership of securities or partnership or other ownership interests, by contract or otherwise."Dealer." A person required to be licensed under this act who is engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging new or used vehicles or an interest in new or used vehicles, regardless of whether the vehicles are owned by that person. The term includes persons engaged in consignment sales for a seller, but does not include a person issued an identification number by the Department of Transportation, unless the board has also issued a dealer license to the person. Vehicle dealers shall be classified as one or more of the following:(1) A new vehicle dealer, who is a person engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging new and used vehicles, trailers or semitrailers for commission, compensation or other consideration.[, who holds a franchise with a manufacturer or distributor, giving the dealer selling rights for that particular line-make of new vehicles, trailers or semitrailers, or who is a distributor of new vehicles, trailers or semitrailers who holds a franchise with a manufacturer or distributor of vehicles, trailers and semitrailers.](2) A used vehicle dealer, who is a person engaged in 20260SB1182PN1866 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the business of buying, selling or exchanging used vehicles, trailers or semitrailers for commission, compensation or other consideration. The term includes fleet owners who engage directly in the retail sale of its fleet vehicles.(3) A new manufactured housing dealer, who is a person engaged in the business of selling new manufactured housing and buying, selling or exchanging used manufactured housing or mobile homes for commission, compensation or other consideration and who holds a franchise with a manufacturer or distributor giving the dealer selling rights for a particular line-make of new manufactured housing.(4) A used manufactured housing or mobile home dealer, who is a person engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging used manufactured housing or mobile homes for commission, compensation or other consideration.(5) A new recreational vehicle dealer, who is a person engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging new and used recreational vehicles for commission, compensation or other consideration and who holds a franchise with a manufacturer or distributor giving the dealer selling rights for a particular line of new recreational vehicles.(6) A used recreational vehicle dealer, who is a person engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging used recreational vehicles for commission, compensation or other consideration.(7) A mobility vehicle dealer."Dealer data system." A software, hardware or firmware system that is owned, leased or licensed by a dealer, that includes a system of web-based applications, computer software or computer hardware, whether located at the dealer's dealership 20260SB1182PN1866 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or hosted remotely, and stores or provides access to protected dealer data, a dealership management system or a consumer relationship management system."Dealer data vendor." A third-party dealer data system provider, consumer relationship management system provider or third-party vendor providing similar services that store protected dealer data pursuant to a contract with the dealer.* * *"Other generally accepted standards." Security standards that are at least as comprehensive AND STRINGENT as STAR standards."Ownership interest." As follows:(1) Either:(i) with respect to a privately held person, the legal or beneficial ownership of any class of security, including convertible debts, or the right to participate in the earnings of the person; or(ii) with respect to a person that equity securities are publicly traded on any national exchange in the United States, 5% or more of any class of equity security, including convertible debts, or the right to participate in the earnings.(2) For purposes of this definition, security shall include any interest, whether the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited partner, limited liability company member convertible debt holder or otherwise.(3) To hold an ownership interest means to have possession of, title to or control of the ownership interest, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary or an agent.20260SB1182PN1866 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Protected dealer data." Any personal , financial or other data pertaining to a consumer DATA provided to a dealer by a consumer or otherwise obtained by a dealer, and any other data related to a dealer's business operations, that is stored or maintained by a dealer in that dealer's data system or in any other manner.* * *"REQUIRED MANUFACTURER DATA." DATA THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE OBTAINED BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW OR TO COMPLETE OR VERIFY A TRANSACTION BETWEEN THE DEALER AND THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR. THE TERM INCLUDES INFORMATION THAT IS REASONABLY NECESSARY FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A SAFETY RECALL OR OTHER LEGAL NOTICE OBLIGATION.(2) THE SALE AND DELIVERY OF A NEW MOTOR VEHICLE OR A CERTIFIED USED MOTOR VEHICLE TO A CONSUMER.(3) THE VALIDATION AND PAYMENT OF CONSUMER OR DEALER INCENTIVES.(4) CLAIMS FOR DEALER-SUPPLIED SERVICES RELATING TO PARTS OR REPAIRS FOR WARRANTY, SERVICE CONTRACTS, RECALLS, SUBSCRIPTIONS AND CONNECTED SERVICES.* * *"STAR standards." Applicable security standards published by the Standards for Technology in Automotive Retail as published on the effective date of this definition.* * *"Third party." Includes service providers, vendors, including dealer data vendors and authorized integrators, a manufacturer or affiliate of a manufacturer acting in the 20260SB1182PN1866 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 capacity of a vendor, service provider or dealer data vendor, or any other individual or entity other than the dealer. The term does not include a governmental entity acting under Federal, State or local law, or any third party acting pursuant to a valid court order.* * *Section 3. Section 303(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 303. License to engage in business.(a) License required.--* * *(4) The board shall deny a vehicle dealer license application that, if granted by the board, would allow a manufacturer, or any parent, subsidiary, affiliate or any other person affiliated with the manufacturer or distributor, to maintain an ownership interest, operate or control a vehicle dealer, unless the applicant qualifies for an exception under section 310(c).* * *Section 4. Section 307(a) of the act is amended and subsection (b.1) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 307. Reimbursement for all parts and service required by the manufacturer or distributor; reimbursement audits.(a) Manufacturers or distributors to notify dealers of their obligations.--(1) Each new vehicle manufacturer or distributor shall:(i) specify in writing to each of its new vehicle dealers licensed in this Commonwealth the dealer's obligations for predelivery preparation and warranty 20260SB1182PN1866 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service on its products[, shall compensate];(ii) compensate according to this section, any dealer that furnishes labor, parts and materials under the warranty or extended warranty, certified preowned warranty, manufacturer-sponsored maintenance program, manufacturer-directed component installation or assembly, parts exchange program, predelivery preparation, diagnostic work or a service contract issued by a manufacturer or distributor or its common entity;(iii) compensate the new vehicle dealer for service required of the dealer by the manufacturer or distributor; and [shall](iv) provide the dealer with a schedule of compensation to be paid the dealer for parts, work and service[,] and the time allowance for the performance of such work and service.(2) Compensation for parts, including major assemblies and electric vehicle batteries used in warranty service, extended warranty, certified preowned warrant y, manufacturer- sponsored maintenance program, manufacturer-directed component installation or assembly, parts exchange program or a service contract shall be at the dealer's retail rate. The following shall apply:(i) The dealer's retail rate for parts shall be established by the dealer's submitting to the manufacturer or distributor a declaration of the average percentage markup which shall be the lesser of the following orders which cover repairs made no more than 180 days before the submission:(A) One hundred sequential nonwarranty customer-20260SB1182PN1866 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paid service repair orders which contain parts that are used in warranty-like service or repair.(B) Ninety consecutive days of nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders which contain parts that are used in warranty-like service or repair.(ii) The declaration under subparagraph (i) shall be presumed to be [reasonable] accurate, except that a manufacturer or distributor may, not later than 60 days after submission, rebut the presumption by substantiating that the declaration is [unreasonable or] materially inaccurate.(iii) The retail rate shall go into effect 60 days following the declaration under subparagraph (i), unless the franchisor audits the submitted repair orders and a rebuttal under subparagraph (ii) occurs.(iv) If the declared retail rate is rebutted, the manufacturer or distributor shall propose an adjustment of the markup based on the rebuttal no later than 60 days after submission.(v) A manufacturer shall provide written support to the dealer for the rebuttal retail rate that is proposed. If the dealer does not agree with the proposed markup, the dealer may file a protest after receipt of the proposal by the manufacturer or distributor. If a protest is filed, the board shall inform the manufacturer or distributor that a protest has been filed and that a hearing will be held on the protest. In a hearing held under this subparagraph, the manufacturer or distributor shall have the burden of proving that:20260SB1182PN1866 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) the retail rate declared by the dealer was [unreasonable or] materially inaccurate; and(B) the manufacturer's or distributor's proposed adjustment of the markup is [reasonable] accurate.(3) Compensation for labor used in warranty service, extended warranty, certified preowned warranty, manufacturer-sponsored maintenance program, manufacturer-directed component installation or assembly, parts exchange program or a service contract shall be at the dealer's retail rate. The following shall apply:(i) The dealer's hourly retail rate for labor shall be established by submitting [the following] a declaration with the following calculations to the manufacturer or distributor:(A) [A declaration of the average labor rate calculated by dividing the amount of the dealer's total labor sales by the number of total labor hours that generated the sales.] The retail rate for labor that shall be equal to the dealer's effective nonwarranty labor rate multiplied by the number of hours allowed for the repair under the manufacturer's or distributor's time allowances used in compensating the dealer for warranty work.(B) [The] The retail rate for labor that shall be equal to the dealer's effective nonwarranty labor rate multiplied by the number of hours allowed for the repair under the manufacturer's or distributor's time allowances used in compensating the dealer for warranty work. THE EFFECTIVE NONWARRANTY LABOR RATE SHALL BE DETERMINED, USING THE SUBMITTED 20260SB1182PN1866 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBSTANTIATING ORDERS UNDER CLAUSE (C), BY DIVIDING THE TOTAL CUSTOMER LABOR CHARGES FOR QUALIFYING NONWARRANTY REPAIRS IN THE REPAIR ORDERS BY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF HOURS THAT WOULD BE ALLOWED FOR THE REPAIRS IF THE REPAIRS WERE MADE UNDER THE MANUFACTURER'S OR DISTRIBUTOR'S TIME ALLOWANCES USED IN COMPENSATING THE DEALER FOR WARRANTY WORK.(C) The lesser of the following orders which cover repairs made no more than 180 days before the submission:(I) One hundred sequential nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders.(II) Ninety consecutive days of nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders.(ii) The declaration under subparagraph [(i)(A)] (i) shall be presumed to be [reasonable] accurate, except that a manufacturer or distributor may, no later than 60 days after submission, rebut the presumption by substantiating that the rate is [unreasonable or] materially inaccurate.(iii) The average labor rate shall go into effect 60 days following the declaration under subparagraph [(i)(A)] (i), unless the franchisor audits the submitted repair orders and a rebuttal under subparagraph (ii) occurs.(iv) If the declared rate is rebutted, the manufacturer or distributor shall propose an adjustment of the labor rate based on the rebuttal not later than 60 days after submission.(v) A manufacturer shall provide written support to 20260SB1182PN1866 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the dealer for the rebuttal rate that is proposed. If the dealer does not agree with the proposed labor rate, the dealer may file a protest after receipt of the proposal by the manufacturer or distributor. If a protest is filed, the board shall inform the manufacturer or distributor that a protest has been filed and that a hearing will be held on the protest. In a hearing held under this subparagraph, the manufacturer or distributor shall have the burden of proving that:(A) the retail rate declared by the dealer was [unreasonable or] materially inaccurate; and(B) the manufacturer's or distributor's proposed adjustment of the retail rate is [reasonable] accurate.(vi) The retail rate for labor shall be equal to the dealer's effective nonwarranty labor rate multiplied by the number of hours allowed for the repair under the manufacturer's or distributor's time allowances used in compensating the dealer for warranty work.(vii) The effective nonwarranty labor rate shall be determined, using the submitted substantiating orders under subparagraph (v), by dividing the total customer labor charges for qualifying nonwarranty repairs in the repair orders by the total number of hours that would be allowed for the repairs if the repairs were made under the manufacturer's or distributor's time allowances used in compensating the dealer for warranty work.(4) This subsection shall not apply to manufacturers or distributors of manufactured housing.(b.1) Exceptions.--When calculating the retail rate 20260SB1182PN1866 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 customarily charged by the dealer for parts and labor under this section, the following work shall not be included:* * *(7) Repairs of conditions caused by a collision, a road hazard, the force of the elements, vandalism, theft or owner, operational or third-party negligence or deliberate act.* * *Section 5. Section 310(a) introductory paragraph and (8.2), (b) introductory paragraph and (5) and (c)(1), (5) and (6) of the act are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 310. Unlawful acts by manufacturers or distributors.(a) Unlawful coercive acts.--It shall be a violation for any manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, field representative, officer, agent, subsidiary, affiliate, controlled entity or any representative whatsoever of such manufacturer, factory branch or distributor licensed under this chapter to require, attempt to require, coerce or attempt to coerce any new vehicle dealer in this Commonwealth to:* * *(8.2) (i) Purchase a good or service of any nature from a vendor selected, identified or designated by a manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, distributor branch or an affiliate of a manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, distributor branch by agreement, program, incentive provision or other method [if expanding, constructing or significantly modifying a facility] without allowing the dealer the option to obtain a good or service of substantially similar quality from a vendor chosen by the dealer and approved by the manufacturer, 20260SB1182PN1866 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which approval may not be unreasonably withheld.(ii) Nothing under this paragraph shall be construed to:(A) Allow a dealer or vendor to eliminate or impair a manufacturer's intellectual property rights, including a manufacturer's intellectual property rights in a trademark.(B) Permit a dealer to erect or maintain signs that do not conform to the intellectual property usage guidelines of the manufacturer. If the goods or services to be supplied to the dealer by a vendor selected, identified or designated by the manufacturer or distributor are signs or other franchisor image elements to be purchased or leased to the dealer, the dealer shall have the right to purchase or lease the signs or other franchisor image elements of similar quality and design from the manufacturer or a vendor selected by the dealer. This clause shall NOT be construed to allow a dealer or vendor to violate directly or indirectly the intellectual property rights of the manufacturer or distributor, including the manufacturer's or distributor's intellectual property rights in any trademarks or trade dress, or other intellectual property interests owned or controlled by the manufacturer or distributor, or to permit a dealer to erect or maintain signs that do not conform to the reasonable intellectual property right or trademark and trade dress usage guidelines of the manufacturer or distributor. 20260SB1182PN1866 - 15 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(b) Violations.--It shall be a violation of this chapter for any manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, field representative, officer, agent, subsidiary, affiliate, controlled entity or any representative whatsoever of such manufacturer, factory branch or distributor licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter to:* * *(5) Fail to respond in writing to a request for consent as specified in paragraphs (3) and (4) within 60 days of receipt of a written request. [on the forms, if any, generally utilized by the manufacturer or distributor for such purposes and containing the information required. The failure to respond within the time period set forth in this paragraph shall be deemed to be approval of the request, and the manufacturer or distributor shall execute and deliver a franchise to the applicant within 30 days of the expiration of this time period. A manufacturer or distributor shall acknowledge in writing to the applicant the receipt of the forms, and, if the manufacturer or distributor requires additional information to complete its review, the manufacturer or distributor shall notify the applicant within 15 days of the receipt of the forms. If the manufacturer or distributor fails to request additional information from the applicant within 15 days after receipt of the initial forms, the 60-day time period for approval shall be deemed to run from the initial receipt date. Otherwise, the 60-day time period for approval shall run from receipt of the supplemental requested information. In no event shall the total time period for approval exceed 75 days from the date 20260SB1182PN1866 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the receipt of the initial forms.] The following apply:(i) A written request under this paragraph shall be deemed complete if the request includes:(A) the applicant's name, address, financial qualifications and business experience during the previous five years;(B) a certification that the applicant meets the standards required to be licensed as a new vehicle dealer in this Commonwealth; and(C) a copy of the full agreement for the proposed transaction in the form existing as of the date of the notice.(ii) Subsequent additions, modifications or amendments to an agreement shall not toll the time in which the manufacturer or distributor is required to provide a response under this paragraph.(iii) The manufacturer or distributor may request additional supporting documentation as may be reasonably required by the manufacturer or distributor to determine if an objection to the sale or transfer may be made, and the applicant shall provide the requested documentation within 10 business days. A request shall not toll the time in which the manufacturer or distributor is required to provide notice.(iv) The manufacturer or distributor and the applicant may, but are not required to, mutually agree to toll any of the time periods provided under this paragraph to facilitate the exchange of information.(v) Failure of the manufacturer or distributor to notify the applicant within the 60-day period of a 20260SB1182PN1866 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rejection shall be deemed an approval of the transfer and the manufacturer or distributor shall execute and deliver a franchise to the applicant within 30 days of the expiration of this time period. An objection shall not be sufficient unless the failure to approve is reasonable.(vi) Grounds that may be considered reasonable for a failure to approve include an individual who is the applicant or is in control of an entity that is an applicant:(A) lacks good moral character;(B) lacks motor vehicle dealership management experience;(C) lacks financial ability to be the dealer; or(D) fails to meet the standards required to be licensed as a new vehicle dealer in this Commonwealth.(vii) An objection shall not prevent the sale, transfer, assignment or change, if requested in writing by the applicant, if the board has determined within 30 days after receipt of an objection to the proposed sale, transfer or change and after a hearing on the matter, that the failure to permit or honor the sale, transfer, assignment or change is unreasonable under the circumstances.* * *(20) Sell or activate for a fee any permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on, service, feature, improvement or upgrade on or to any motor vehicle owned or leased by a retail customer located in this Commonwealth, through over-the-air or remote means, unless 20260SB1182PN1866 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the manufacturer or distributor complies with all of the following requirements:(i) The manufacturer or distributor permits all of its franchised same line-make dealers that are located in this Commonwealth to sell the same motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature or improvement to retail customers on the same terms offered by the manufacturer or distributor.(ii) The permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature or improvement is activated or installed directly on the retail customer's motor vehicle through remote electronic transmission.(iii) If the sale or activation of the permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature or improvement by either the manufacturer or the direct involvement of the dealer who sells or leases the vehicle to the retail customer occurs at the time of the new motor vehicle sale or lease or within a five-year period immediately following the sale or lease of the new motor vehicle by a franchised motor vehicle dealer in this Commonwealth, the manufacturer or distributor provides the franchised motor vehicle dealer that sold the new motor vehicle at least 12% of the gross payment received by the manufacturer or distributor for the sale or activation of the accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature or improvement to the original vehicle owner or lessee.(iv) The manufacturer or distributor provides compensation consistent with section 307 to an authorized 20260SB1182PN1866 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dealer for providing assistance or repair at the dealership for a failed, damaged, nonfunctioning or defective over-the-air or remote accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature or improvement, change or repair administered by the vehicle manufacturer to any part, system, accessory or function of the customer's vehicle at the request of the customer.(v) When providing a new vehicle to a dealer for offer or sale to the public, the manufacturer or distributor shall provide to the dealer:(A) A written disclosure that may be furnished by the dealer to a potential purchaser or lessee of the new motor vehicle identifying each permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on, service, upgrade, feature or improvement of the vehicle that may be initiated, updated, changed or maintained by the manufacturer or distributor through over-the-air or remote means.(B) T he A WRITTEN DISCLOSURE CONTAINING THE CURRENT cost to the retail customer at the time of the new motor vehicle sale or lease, AND A STATEMENT that all accessories, options, add-ons, services, upgrades, features or improvements may be purchased directly from the dealer. Every manufacturer or distributor that, through over-the-air or remote means, provides any permanent or temporary motor vehicle accessory, option, add-on, service, feature, improvement or upgrade on or to any motor vehicle owned or leased by a retail customer located in this Commonwealth shall provide to each of its franchised 20260SB1182PN1866 - 20 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dealers within this Commonwealth, on a basis no less frequently than monthly, a statement itemizing the type, volume and gross receipts generated from the sale of over-the- air or remotely activated products and services that were sold to the dealer's customers and calculating the fees and commissions to which the dealer is entitled under this subparagraph. A manufacturer or distributor may comply with this subparagraph by notifying the dealer that the information is available on a publicly accessible Internet website or by other digital means. (21) Fail to reimburse a dealer located in this Commonwealth in full:(i) For the actual cost, including applicable taxes and third-party fees, of providing a loaner or rental vehicle to any customer who is having a vehicle serviced at the dealership if the provision of a loaner or rental vehicle is required by the manufacturer.(ii) Whether or not the dealer provides the customer with a model vehicle similar to the vehicle the customer brought in for service, in the event the dealer does not have a similar model loaner or rental vehicle available, or if the provision of a rental or loaner vehicle to a customer is required or approved by the manufacturer or distributor.(iii) All or any portion of the time the dealer has provided the customer with a loaner or rental vehicle due to the unavailability of one or more parts sold or distributed by the manufacturer or through a supplier designated or approved by the manufacturer.20260SB1182PN1866 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (22) Impose unreasonable restrictions on a new vehicle dealer relative to transfer, sale, right to renew, termination, discipline, noncompetition covenants, site-control, whether by sublease, collateral pledge of lease or otherwise, right of first refusal to purchase, option to purchase, compliance with subjective standards and assertion of legal or equitable rights.(c) Restriction on ownership of dealer.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, and regardless of whether the person has ever been a franchise dealer in this Commonwealth, a manufacturer [or], distributor, factory branch, subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity of a manufacturer or distributor or any representative of a manufacturer, distributor or factory branch shall not:(i) own or hold an interest, other than a passive, minority interest in a publicly traded dealer held for investment purposes, in a dealer licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter which is engaging in the business of buying, selling or exchanging vehicles; or(ii) operate or control a dealer licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter which is engaging in the business of buying, selling or exchanging vehicles.* * *(5) A manufacturer or distributor shall not unfairly discriminate or compete in terms of any sales, service or operational activities with a new vehicle dealer of the same or an affiliate line-make when a manufacturer or distributor operates a new vehicle dealer under this subsection.20260SB1182PN1866 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The following shall apply:(i) A manufacturer [or], distributor, factory branch, subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity of a manufacturer, distributor or any representative the manufacturer, distributor or factory branch may own, operate or control not more than five new vehicle dealerships trading solely in electric vehicles, as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), that are not sold as new vehicles by a licensed independent new vehicle dealer pursuant to an existing franchise with a manufacturer or distributor, if each of the following conditions are met:(A) Each of the new vehicle dealerships selling the manufacturer's new motor vehicles in this Commonwealth trade exclusively in the manufacturer's line-make.(B) Each of the new vehicle dealerships selling the manufacturer's motor vehicles in this Commonwealth are determined to be in compliance with this chapter.(C) Either of the following apply:(I) The manufacturer, distributor, factory branch or a subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor has not acquired, nor does it hold [a controlling], either directly or indirectly, any ownership interest in another manufacturer or distributor, required to be licensed under this chapter that sells new vehicles to a licensed independent new vehicle dealer pursuant to an existing franchise 20260SB1182PN1866 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the manufacturer or distributor.(II) If [a controlling] any ownership interest is acquired, the manufacturer, distributor or a subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity may not continue to operate or control a new vehicle dealership under this subsection for a period not more than 12 months from the date it acquired the [controlling] ownership interest.(D) Either of the following apply:(I) [A controlling interest in the original manufacturer, distributor or any subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity was not transferred, sold or conveyed to another manufacturer, distributor, person or entity required to be licensed under this chapter.] A manufacturer or distributor that sells new vehicles to a licensed independent new vehicle dealer pursuant to an existing franchise with the manufacturer or distributor does not, directly or indirectly, including through a subsidiary, affiliate or a controlled entity, hold any ownership interest or acquire any ownership interest in a manufacturer or distributor owning, operating or controlling a vehicle dealership trading solely in electric vehicles pursuant to this subsection.(II) If [a controlling interest is transferred, sold or conveyed to another manufacturer, distributor, person or entity 20260SB1182PN1866 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required to be licensed under this chapter, the entity] any ownership interest is acquired by a manufacturer or distributor that sells new vehicles by a licensed independent new vehicle dealer pursuant to an existing franchise with the manufacturer or distributor, the manufacturer or distributor owning, operating or controlling a vehicle dealership trading solely in electric vehicles pursuant to this section may not continue to operate or control a new vehicle dealership under this subsection for a period not more than 12 months from the date it acquired the [controlling] ownership interest.(E) The manufacturer shall have continuously offered electric vehicles for sale for a period of not less than 12 months prior to [the effective date of this clause] JULY 9, 2014.(ii) Nothing under this chapter shall prohibit a manufacturer operating or controlling a new vehicle dealership under this paragraph from owning, operating or controlling a warranty facility for warranty repairs on the manufacturer's line-make of vehicles.* * *Section 6. Section 316(c) of the act is amended to read:Section 316. Manufacturer or distributor repurchase of inventory and equipment.* * *(c) Limited applicability.--This section shall not apply to manufacturers, distributors or dealers of recreational vehicles or manufactured housing[, nor shall it apply to motorcycle 20260SB1182PN1866 - 25 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturers, distributors or dealers except when the unilateral termination or failure to renew is by the manufacturer or distributor].Section 7. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 334. Consumer data protection.(a) Data submission to manufacturers or third parties.-- (1) A manufacturer or third party may not require a dealer to grant to the manufacturer, third party or other person or party acting on behalf of the manufacturer or third party, direct or indirect access to the dealer's dealer data system.(2) A dealer may submit data or information to a manufacturer or third party through an electronic file format or protocol if the electronic file format or protocol is widely accepted and complies with STAR standards or other generally accepted standards THAT ARE AT LEAST AS COMPREHENSIVE AND STRINGENT AS THE STAR STANDARDS . (3) A manufacturer or third party may not:(i) access, share, use or transmit protected dealer data without prior express written consent;(ii) engage in any act of cyber ransom or take action to prohibit or limit a dealer's ability to protect, store, copy, share or use protected dealer data;(iii) impose a fee or other restriction on the dealer or authorized integrator for accessing or sharing protected dealer data, writing data to a dealer data system or submitting data or information to the manufacturer or third party;(iv) prohibit a third party or authorized integrator that satisfies STAR standards from integrating into the 20260SB1182PN1866 - 26 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dealer's dealer data system; or(v) place an unreasonable restriction on integration by an authorized integrator or third party.(4) A dealer may unilaterally revoke the dealer's prior express written consent under paragraph (3)(i) with 30 days' notice to a manufacturer without cause or immediately for cause. A manufacturer may not seek or require prior express written consent as a condition of or fact for consideration or eligibility for a manufacturer program, a standard or policy or a benefit to the dealer. For purposes of this paragraph, the dealer's data contained in or on a dealer data system owned, leased or licensed by a dealer in this Commonwealth is the property of the dealer.(B) DATA SUBMISSION TO MANUFACTURERS OR DISTRIBUTORS.--(1) A MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR MAY NOT ACCESS, SHARE, SELL, COPY, USE, TRANSMIT OR REQUIRE A DEALER TO SHARE OR PROVIDE ACCESS TO PROTECTED DEALER DATA BEYOND THE REQUIRED MANUFACTURER DATA WITHOUT PRIOR EXPRESS WRITTEN CONSENT. A DEALER MAY UNILATERALLY REVOKE THE DEALER'S PRIOR EXPRESS WRITTEN CONSENT WITHOUT CAUSE WITH 60-DAY NOTICE OR IMMEDIATELY FOR CAUSE.(2) A MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR MAY NOT UNREASONABLY REQUIRE PRIOR EXPRESS WRITTEN CONSENT AS A CONDITION FOR ELIGIBILITY FOR ANY MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR PROGRAM, STANDARD OR POLICY, INCLUDING ONE THAT OFFERS A BONUS, INCENTIVE, REBATE OR OTHER PAYMENT OR BENEFIT TO A DEALER.(3) THIS ACT SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO RESTRICT OR LIMIT A MANUFACTURER'S OR DISTRIBUTOR'S RIGHT TO OBTAIN REQUIRED MANUFACTURER DATA, USE REQUIRED MANUFACTURER DATA FOR ANY OF THE PURPOSES IDENTIFIED IN THE DEFINITION OF REQUIRED 20260SB1182PN1866 - 27 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MANUFACTURER DATA OR USE OR CONTROL DATA THAT IS PROPRIETARY TO THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR, CREATED BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR, OBTAINED FROM A SOURCE OTHER THAN THE DEALER OR THAT IS PUBLIC INFORMATION.(4) A MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR MAY NOT ENGAGE IN AN ACT OF CYBER RANSOM OR TAKE AN ACTION BY CONTRACT, TECHNICAL MEANS OR ANY OTHER MEANS TO PROHIBIT OR LIMIT A DEALER'S ABILITY TO PROTECT, STORE, COPY, SHARE OR USE PROTECTED DEALER DATA.(b) (C) Responsibilities and restrictions.-- (1) A manufacturer or a third party acting on behalf of a manufacturer shall do all of the following:(i) Comply with all and not knowingly cause a dealer to violate any applicable restrictions on reuse or disclosure of the consumer data established by Federal or State law and provide a written statement to the dealer upon request describing the established procedures adopted by the manufacturer or third party acting on behalf of the manufacturer which meet or exceed any Federal or State requirements to safeguard consumer data, including those established under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 94 (relating to privacy).(ii) Indemnify the dealer for any third-party claims asserted against or damages incurred by the dealer to the extent the claims or damages are related to or caused by the access to and disclosure of protected dealer data resulting from a breach caused by the manufacturer or third party to which the manufacturer has provided the consumer data and proprietary data . (iii) After written request of the dealer, provide a 20260SB1182PN1866 - 28 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 written list of the consumer data and proprietary data obtained from the dealer and all persons to whom any data has been provided by the manufacturer or a third party acting on behalf of a manufacturer during the preceding six months. The dealer may make a request no more than once every six months. The list must indicate the specific fields of consumer or proprietary data that were provided to each person. The list need not include any person to whom consumer data and proprietary data was provided if the dealer has previously consented in writing to the person receiving the consumer or proprietary data and the dealer has not withdrawn consent in writing. INCLUDE: (A) A PERSON TO WHOM CONSUMER DATA AND PROPRIETARY DATA WAS PROVIDED IF THE DEALER HAS PREVIOUSLY CONSENTED IN WRITING TO THE PERSON RECEIVING THE CONSUMER OR PROPRIETARY DATA AND THE DEALER HAS NOT WITHDRAWN CONSENT IN WRITING;(B) A PERSON TO WHOM CONSUMER DATA WAS PROVIDED, OR THE SPECIFIC CONSUMER DATA PROVIDED TO THE PERSON, IF THE PERSON WAS, AT THE TIME THE CONSUMER DATA WAS PROVIDED, A SERVICE PROVIDER, SUBCONTRACTOR OR CONSULTANT ACTING IN THE COURSE OF PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES ON BEHALF OF OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE DEALER, MANUFACTURER, DISTRIBUTOR, THIRD PARTY OR AFFILIATE, PROVIDED THAT THE DEALER, MANUFACTURER, DISTRIBUTOR, THIRD PARTY OR AFFILIATE HAS ENTERED INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH THE PERSON REQUIRING THAT THE PERSON COMPLY WITH THE SAFEGUARD REQUIREMENTS OF APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, INCLUDING, BUT NOT 20260SB1182PN1866 - 29 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LIMITED TO, THOSE ESTABLISHED UNDER 15 U.S.C. § 6801 (RELATING TO PROTECTION OF NONPUBLIC PERSONAL INFORMATION); OR(C) A PERSON TO WHOM CONSUMER DATA WAS PROVIDED OR THE SPECIFIC CONSUMER DATA PROVIDED TO THE PERSON, IF THAT REQUIRES A MANUFACTURER, DISTRIBUTOR OR AFFILIATE OF THE PERSON TO VIOLATE ANY APPLICABLE RESTRICTIONS ON REUSE OR DISCLOSURE OF THE CONSUMER DATA ESTABLISHED BY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.(2) A dealer data vendor shall do all of the following:(i) Adopt and make available a standardized framework for the exchange, integration and sharing of data from dealer data systems and authorized integrators and retrieval of such data by authorized integrators. Use of the STAR standards or the standards compatible with the STAR standards shall be deemed to be in compliance with this requirement.(ii) Provide access to open application interfaces to authorized integrators. In the event that application interfaces are no longer the reasonable commercial or technical standard for secure data integration, a similar open access integration method may be provided, to the extent it provides the same or better access to authorized integrators as an application interface and utilizes the required standardized framework.(3) A dealer data vendor and authorized integrators:(i) May access, use, store or share protected dealer data or any other data from a dealer data system only to the extent permitted in the written agreement with the dealer.20260SB1182PN1866 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Must make any agreement regarding access to, sharing or selling of, copying, using or transmitting protected dealer data terminable after no more than 30 days notice from the dealer.(iii) Shall, after notice of the dealer's intent to terminate a contract, in order to prevent any risk of consumer harm or inconvenience, work to ensure a secure transition of all protected dealer data to a successor dealer data vendor or authorized integrator, including:(A) providing unrestricted access to all protected dealer data and all other data stored in the dealer data system in a commercially reasonable time and format that a successor dealer data vendor or authorized integrator can access and use; and(B) deleting or returning to the dealer all protected dealer data prior to termination of the contract under any written directions of the dealer.(iv) Shall provide a dealer, upon request, with a listing of all entities with whom the dealer data vendor or authorized integrator is sharing protected dealer data or with whom the dealer data vendor and authorized integrator has allowed access to protected dealer data.(v) Shall allow a dealer to audit the dealer data vendor or authorized integrator's access to and use of any protected dealer data.(4) This subsection shall not apply to any financial institution or data subject to 15 U.S.C. Ch. 94. The rights conferred on dealers in this subsection are not waivable and may not be reduced or otherwise modified by any contract or agreement. This subsection shall be interpreted and enforced 20260SB1182PN1866 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth without giving effect to any choice of law or conflict of laws principles that would require the application of laws in any other jurisdiction.(D) LIMITATIONS.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A MANUFACTURER, VENDOR SELECTED BY A MANUFACTURER OR A THIRD PARTY FROM DISCHARGING ITS OBLIGATION AS A SERVICE PROVIDER OR OTHERWISE UNDER FEDERAL, STATE OR LOCAL LAW TO PROTECT AND SECURE PROTECTED DEALER DATA OR TO OTHERWISE LIMIT THOSE RESPONSIBILITIES.Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1182PN1866 - 32 - <--1234567891011